Utah statutes.
9-7-101.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Division" means the State Library Division.
(2)  "Library board" means the library board of directors appointed locally as
authorized by Section 9-7-402 or 9-7-502 and which exercises general policy
authority for library services within a city or county of the state,
regardless of the title by which it is known locally.
(3)  "Physical format" means a transportable medium in which analog or digital
information is published, such as print, microform, magnetic disk, or optical
disk.
(4)  "Policy" means the public library online access policy adopted by a
library board to meet the requirements of Section 9-7-215.
(5)  "Political subdivision" means a county, city, town, school district,
public transit district, redevelopment agency, or special improvement or
taxing district.
(6)  "State agency" means the state, an office, department, agency, authority,
commission, board, institution, hospital, college, university, or other
instrumentality of the state.
(7) (a)  "State publication" means a book, compilation, directory, document,
contract or grant report, hearing memorandum, journal, law, legislative bill,
magazine, map, monograph, order, ordinance, pamphlet, periodical, proceeding,
public memorandum, resolution, register, rule, report, statute, audiovisual
material, electronic publication, micrographic form and tape or disc recording
regardless of format or method of reproduction, issued or published by a state
agency or political subdivision for distribution.
(b)  "State publication" does not include correspondence, internal
confidential publications, office memoranda, university press publications, or
publications of the state historical society.
